Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-518
License and registration; suspension for nonpayment of judgment; exception.

If the judgment creditor consents in writing, in such form as the department may prescribe, that the judgment debtor be allowed license and registration or nonresident's operating privilege, the same may be allowed by the department, in its discretion, for six months from the date of such consent and thereafter until such consent is revoked in writing, notwithstanding default in the payment of such judgment, or of any installments thereof prescribed in sections 60-521 to 60-523, provided the judgment debtor furnishes proof of financial responsibility.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 18, p. 491.